District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.10

Water rents — Refund for erroneous payment.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized to cause all water rents erroneously paid after March 3, 1905, in the District of Columbia to be refunded in the manner prescribed by law for the refunding of erroneously paid taxes; provided, that application for refund shall be made within 2 years after such erroneous payment. And after March 3, 1905, the said Mayor is authorized to cause to be refunded in the same manner and subject to the same limitations all money paid for water for any special purpose where the project is abandoned and the water not used, and for tapping water mains and for furnishing stopcock where the service is not rendered and the material is not furnished; and all money refunded under this section shall be paid from and charged to the water fund.

Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 912, ch. 1406
1981 Ed., § 43-1521.
1973 Ed., § 43-1519.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.